Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Science, Technology and Energy Financial Aid

§ 9-12-201.
Assumption of science technology and energy authority functions.

In assuming the functions of the science energy and technology authority the council shall administer the program in accordance with the provisions of this act generally and the specific provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2.

§ 9-12-202.
Applications for financial aid from the council.

All applications for financial aid shall be submitted to the council who shall investigate and prepare a report concerning the advisability of approving the proposed financial aid for the applicant and concerning any other factors deemed relevant by the council.

The investigation and report shall include such facts about the applicant under consideration as its history, wage standards, job opportunities, stability of employment, past and present financial condition and structure, pro-forma income statements, present and future markets and prospects, integrity of management as well as the feasibility of the proposed product to be granted financial aid, including the state of development of the product as well as the likelihood of its commercial feasibility.

After consideration of the report, the council shall approve or deny the application. The applicant shall be promptly notified of the decision. In making the decision as to approval or denial of an application, the council shall give priority to those applicants whereby:

The proceeds of the seed capital aid will only be used to cover the initial capitalization needs of the enterprise within Wyoming except as otherwise authorized in this article;

The enterprise has a reasonable chance of success;

Participation by the council is necessary to the success of the enterprise because funding for the enterprise is unavailable in the traditional capital markets, or because funding has been offered on terms that would substantially hinder the success of the enterprise;

The enterprise seed capital has the reasonable potential to create a substantial amount of primary employment within the state;

The entrepreneur and other founders of the enterprise have already made or are contractually committed to make a substantial financial and time commitment to the enterprise;

There is a reasonable possibility that the council will recoup at least its initial investment from seed capital contracts; and

Binding commitments have been made to the council by the applicant for adequate reporting of financial data to the council including a requirement for an annual or other periodic audit of the books of the enterprise, and for control by the council over the management of the enterprise, so as to protect the investment including the right of access to financial and other records of the enterprise.

In determining the level of financial support to be advanced, the council shall limit its proportion of financial aid consistent with the existence of a market failure in product development financing but shall not provide more than twenty percent (20%) of the funds of the council for any one (1) project. Any financial aid toward product development financing granted pursuant to this section shall be equally matched or exceeded by the applicant. No financial aid granted pursuant to this section shall in any manner be pledged as collateral by the applicant.

Before granting any seed capital financial aid, the council shall enter into an agreement with the applicant providing for a return to the council which is commensurate with the level of risk and amount of the financial aid.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2.